Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.905

Uniformed personnel—Provisions additional—Liberal construction.

The provisions of this chapter are intended to be additional to other remedies and shall be liberally construed to accomplish their purpose. Except as provided in RCW 53.18.015, 41.58.070, 43.101.095, and 43.101.135, if any provision of this chapter conflicts with any other statute, ordinance, rule or regulation of any public employer, the provisions of this chapter shall control.

[ 2021 c 323 s 23; 2021 c 13 s 4; 1983 c 287 s 5; 1973 c 131 s 10.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2021 c 13 s 4 and by 2021 c 323 s 23, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Severability—1983 c 287: See note following RCW 41.56.450.